Utah statutes.
72-7-209.   Enforcement authority -- Agreements with United States.
(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the department may make rules:
(a)  governing the materials that may be used for screening and the location,
construction, and maintenance of screening for junkyards; and
(b)  implementing and enforcing this part.
(2)  The department may:
(a)  enter into agreements with the secretary pursuant to Title 23, United
States Code as amended, relating to the control of junkyards in areas adjacent
to the interstate and primary systems; and
(b)  take action in the name of the state to comply with the terms of the
agreements.
